District of Columbia statutes.
11-901

Continuation of courts; court of record; seal.

The District of Columbia Court of General Sessions, the Juvenile Court of the District of Columbia, and the District of Columbia Tax Court are consolidated in a single court to be known as the Superior Court of the District of Columbia (hereafter in this title referred to as the “Superior Court”). The Superior Court shall be a court of record in the District of Columbia and shall have a single seal.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 482, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111
Continuation of District of Columbia court system, see § 1-207.18.
This section is referenced in § 7-201.
1981 Ed., § 11-901.
1973 Ed., § 11-901.